Nevada, session 83, AB275.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 179 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Sexual offense against a child” includes any act
upon a child constituting:
1. Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
2. Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
3. Sado-masochistic abuse pursuant to NRS 201.262;
4. Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
5. Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
6. Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210; or
7. Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
Sec. 3. 1. The interception, listening or recording of a wire,
electronic or oral communication by a peace officer, or a person
acting under the direction or request of a peace officer, is not
unlawful if the peace officer or person is intercepting the
communication for the sole purpose of investigating a sexual
offense against a child.
2. As used in this section, “person” means:
(a) A child, with the consent of the parent or legal guardian of
the child; or
(b) The parent or legal guardian of a child.
Sec. 4. NRS 179.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.410 As used in NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, except where the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 179.415 to 179.455,
inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 179.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.460 1. The Attorney General or the district attorney of
any county may apply to a Supreme Court justice or to a district
judge in the county where the interception is to take place for an
order authorizing the interception of wire, electronic or oral
communications, and the judge may, in accordance with NRS
179.470 to 179.515, inclusive, grant an order authorizing the
interception of wire, electronic or oral communications by
investigative or law enforcement officers having responsibility for
the investigation of the offense as to which the application is made,
when the interception may provide evidence of the commission of
murder, kidnapping, robbery, extortion, bribery, escape of an
offender in the custody of the Department of Corrections,
destruction of public property by explosives, a sexual offense
-
*AB275*

– 3 –
against a child, sex trafficking, a violation of NRS 200.463, 200.464
or 200.465, trafficking in persons in violation of NRS 200.467 or
200.468, a violation of NRS 201.553, the commission of any
offense which is made a felony by the provisions of chapter 453 or
454 of NRS or a violation of NRS 463.160 or 465.086.
2. A provider of electronic communication service or a public
utility, an officer, employee or agent thereof or another person
associated with the provider of electronic communication service or
public utility who, pursuant to an order issued pursuant to
subsection 1, provides information or otherwise assists an
investigative or law enforcement officer in the interception of a
wire, electronic or oral communication is immune from any liability
relating to any interception made pursuant to the order.
[3. As used in this section, “sexual offense against a child”
includes any act upon a child constituting:
(a) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(b) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(c) Sado-masochistic abuse pursuant to NRS 201.262;
(d) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(e) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(f) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210; or
(g) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.]
Sec. 6. NRS 200.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.620 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and
NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, 209.419 and 704.195, it is
unlawful for any person to intercept or attempt to intercept any wire
communication unless:
(a) The interception or attempted interception is made with the
prior consent of one of the parties to the communication; and
(b) An emergency situation exists and it is impractical to obtain
a court order as required by NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive,
before the interception, in which event the interception is subject to
the requirements of subsection 3. If the application for ratification is
denied, any use or disclosure of the information so intercepted is
unlawful, and the person who made the interception shall notify the
sender and the receiver of the communication that:
(1) The communication was intercepted; and
(2) Upon application to the court, ratification of the
interception was denied.
2. This section does not apply to any person, or to the officers,
employees or agents of any person, engaged in the business of
providing service and facilities for wire communication where the
interception or attempted interception is to construct, maintain,
conduct or operate the service or facilities of that person.
-
*AB275*

– 4 –
3. Any person who has made an interception in an emergency
situation as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall, within
72 hours of the interception, make a written application to a justice
of the Supreme Court or district judge for ratification of the
interception. The interception must not be ratified unless the
applicant shows that:
(a) An emergency situation existed and it was impractical to
obtain a court order before the interception; and
(b) Except for the absence of a court order, the interception met
the requirements of NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive.
4. NRS 200.610 to 200.690, inclusive, do not prohibit the
recording, and NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, do not prohibit
the reception in evidence, of conversations on wire communications
installed in the office of an official law enforcement or fire-fighting
agency, or a public utility, if the equipment used for the recording is
installed in a facility for wire communications or on a telephone
with a number listed in a directory, on which emergency calls or
requests by a person for response by the law enforcement or fire-
fighting agency or public utility are likely to be received. In
addition, those sections do not prohibit the recording or reception in
evidence of conversations initiated by the law enforcement or fire-
fighting agency or public utility from such a facility or telephone in
connection with responding to the original call or request, if the
agency or public utility informs the other party that the conversation
is being recorded.
5. The interception or attempted interception of a wire
communication is not unlawful under the circumstances set forth in
subsection 1 of NRS 179.463 [.] or subsection 1 of section 3 of this
act.
H
-
*AB275*